Hawaii statutes.
§667-78 Owner-occupant's election of dispute resolution; owner-occupant
program fee; right to dispute resolution waived. (a)
An owner-occupant elects to participate in the mortgage foreclosure dispute
resolution program by returning to the department:

(1) The completed program election form
provided:

(A) Pursuant to section 667-77(2); or

(B) On a website maintained by the
department;

(2) Certification under penalty of perjury
that the mortgagor is an owner-occupant, accompanied with any supporting
documentation, including copies of recent utility billing statements, voter
registration records, real estate property tax records, or state identification
forms; and

(3) A program fee of $300.

The completed form and fees shall
be received by the department no later than thirty days after mailing of the
department's notification pursuant to section 667-77.

(b)
If the completed form and fee are not received within the required time period,
the owner-occupant shall be deemed to have waived any right to participate in
the mortgage foreclosure dispute resolution program with respect to the subject
property and the foreclosure notice filed with the department.

(c)
If the owner-occupant does not elect to participate in dispute resolution
pursuant to this part, the department shall notify the mortgagee within ten
days of receiving an election form indicating nonelection or the termination of
the thirty-day time period for election. After receiving the department's
notification, the mortgagee may proceed with the nonjudicial foreclosure
process according to the process provided in part II of this chapter. [L 2011, c 48, pt of §1, §45(2); am L 2012, c 182, §§42, 49]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next